Colorado statutes. TITLE 33 Parks and Wildlife
PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS
33-6-125. Possession of a loaded firearm in a motor vehicle.

It is unlawful for any person, except a person authorized by law or by the division, to possess or have under the person's control any firearm, other than a pistol or revolver, in or on any motor vehicle unless the chamber of the firearm is unloaded. Any person in possession or in control of a rifle or shotgun in a motor vehicle shall allow any peace officer who is empowered and acting under the authority granted in section 33-6-101 to enforce articles 1 to 6 of this title 33 to inspect the chamber of any rifle or shotgun in the motor vehicle. For the purposes of this section, a "muzzle-loader" shall be considered unloaded if it is not primed, and "primed" means having a percussion cap on the nipple or flint in the striker and powder in the flash pan. Any person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars and an assessment of fifteen license suspension points.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 876, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1026), ch. 423, p. 3696, § 12, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-6-115 as it existed prior to 1984.

Cross references:

(1) For offenses relating to firearms, see article 12 of title 18.

(2) For the short title ("Respect the Great Outdoors Act") and the legislative declaration in HB 19-1026, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 423, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

33-6-126. Shooting from a public road.

It is unlawful for any person, except a duly authorized peace officer acting in the line of duty, to discharge any firearm or release an arrow from, upon, or across any public road. Any person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars and an assessment of five license suspension points.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 877, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1026), ch. 423, p. 3696, § 13, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-6-116 as it existed prior to 1984.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Respect the Great Outdoors Act") and the legislative declaration in HB 19-1026, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 423, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

33-6-127. Hunting with artificial light, night vision, or thermal imaging devices.

Unless otherwise provided by commission rule and except as provided in section 33-6-107 (9) for persons owning or leasing land, members of their family, or their agents, it is unlawful for any person to utilize any artificial light as an aid in hunting or taking any wildlife. For the purposes of this subsection (1), the possession of any firearm with cartridges in the chamber or magazine or loaded with powder and ball or a strung bow, unless the bow is cased, while attempting to project any artificial light into areas where wildlife may be found is prima facie evidence of a violation of this section.

A person who violates this subsection (1) is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of two hundred dollars and an assessment of twenty license suspension points.

Unless otherwise provided by commission rule and except as provided in section 33-6-107 (9) for persons owning or leasing land, members of their family, or their agents, it is unlawful for a person to utilize electronic night vision equipment, electronically enhanced light-gathering optics, or thermal imaging devices as an aid in hunting or taking wildlife outside legal hunting hours according to commission rules.

A person who violates this subsection (2) is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of two thousand dollars and an assessment of twenty license suspension points.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 877, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1588, § 21, effective May 31.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 1030, § 5, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-6-119 as it existed prior to 1984.

33-6-128. Damage or destruction of dens or nests - harassment of wildlife.

Unless permitted by the division, it is unlawful for any person to willfully damage or destroy any wildlife den or nest or their eggs or to harass any wildlife. Any person who violates this subsection (1) is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars and an assessment of ten license suspension points. For the purposes of this subsection (1), nothing shall prohibit the removal of wildlife dens or nests when necessary to prevent damage to property or livestock or while trapping.

Unless otherwise allowed by commission rule or regulation, it is unlawful for any person to knowingly or negligently allow or direct a dog which the person owns or which is under the person's control to harass wildlife, whether or not the wildlife is actually injured by such dog. Any person who violates this subsection (2) commits a petty offense and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of two hundred dollars.

A Colorado wildlife officer or other peace officer may capture or kill any dog he or she determines to be harassing wildlife. The provisions of this subsection (3) shall not apply to dogs that are under the direct personal control of a person.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 877, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 2003:

(3) amended, p. 1631, § 70, effective August 6.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3261, § 559, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 33-6-138 and 33-6-139 as they existed prior to 1984.

33-6-129. Damage to property or habitat under division control.

It is unlawful for any person to remove, damage, deface, or destroy any real or personal property or wildlife habitat under the control of the division. Any person who violates this subsection (1) commits a class 2 misdemeanor. In addition, the court may require the defendant to reimburse the division for any damages.

It is unlawful for a person to use division property in violation of any commission rule. Any person who violates this subsection (2) is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 877, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 2019:

(2) amended, (HB 19-1026), ch. 423, p. 3696, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3261, § 560, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-6-124 as it existed prior to 1984.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Respect the Great Outdoors Act") and the legislative declaration in HB 19-1026, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 423, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

33-6-130. Explosives, toxicants, and poisons not to be used.

Unless permitted by law or by the division, it is unlawful for any person to use toxicants, poisons, drugs, dynamite, explosives, or any stupefying substances for the purpose of hunting, taking, or harassing any wildlife. Any person who violates this subsection (1) commits a class 2 misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of two hundred dollars and is assessed twenty license suspension points.

The division shall cooperate with the department of agriculture in developing policies and procedures for the issuance by said department of permits for the use of poison by livestock owners or operators.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 878, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 1588, § 22, effective May 31.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3261, § 561, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-6-118 as it existed prior to 1984.

33-6-131. Knowingly luring bears.

Unless otherwise permitted by commission rule, it is unlawful for any person to place food or edible waste in the open with the intent of luring a wild bear to such food or edible waste.

This section shall not apply to acts related to agriculture, as defined in section 35-1-102 (1), C.R.S.

For the purposes of this section, "food or edible waste" shall not include live animals or food that is grown in the open prior to such food being harvested.

Any person who violates this section shall be given a warning. Upon a second or subsequent violation of this section, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine not to exceed:

Two hundred dollars for a first offense;

One thousand dollars for a second offense; or

Two thousand dollars for a third or subsequent offense.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 2618, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 2019:

(3) amended, (HB 19-1026), ch. 423, p. 3696, § 15, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Respect the Great Outdoors Act") and the legislative declaration in HB 19-1026, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 423, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

33-6-132. Computer-assisted remote hunting prohibited.

It is unlawful for any person to engage in computer-assisted remote hunting in Colorado. This subsection (1) shall apply if either the wildlife hunted or any device, equipment, or software, including, without limitation, the person's own computer, used to remotely control the weapon is located in Colorado.

It is unlawful for any person to establish or operate computer-assisted remote hunting facilities in Colorado.

Any person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof:

For a first offense, shall be punished by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars nor more than ten thousand dollars and an assessment of twenty license points;

For any subsequent offenses, shall be punished by a fine of not less than ten thousand dollars nor more than one hundred thousand dollars or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or by both such fine and imprisonment. In addition to imposing such punishments, the commission may suspend any wildlife privileges of the person for a minimum of one year to a maximum of a lifetime suspension.

This section shall not apply to persons who provide only:

General-purpose equipment, including computers, cameras, and fencing and building materials;

General-purpose computer software, including operating systems and communication programs; or

General-purpose telecommunications hardware or networking services for computers, including adapters, modems, servers, routers, and other facilities associated with internet access.

Nothing in this section shall preclude the division of parks and wildlife from establishing a special licensing program for mobility-impaired hunters pursuant to section 33-4-119 and rules adopted pursuant to section 33-4-119 or from granting reasonable accommodations for persons with disabilities in accordance with the federal "Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990", 42 U.S.C. sec. 12101 et seq.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 282, § 2, effective August 5.